Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 2.4 Habilitation Procurement Program

37-2.4-1.
Definitions.

The words defined in this section have the meanings set forth below whenever they appear in this chapter, unless context in which they are used clearly requires a different meaning or a different definition as prescribed for a particular section, group of sections, or provision:

“Board” means the habilitation procurement board created under this section;

“Habilitation facility” means a program that is operated primarily for the purpose of the employment and training of persons with a disability by a government agency or a qualified organization licensed by the State of Rhode Island providing vocational rehabilitation to support people with disabilities and:

Maintains an employment ratio of at least forty percent (40%) of the program employees under the procurement contract in question have severe disabilities;

Complies with any applicable occupational health and safety standards prescribed by the United States Department of Labor or is a supported employment program approved by the state of Rhode Island office of rehabilitation services;

Has its principal place of business in Rhode Island;

Produces any goods provided under this section in Rhode Island; and

The services provided, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, are provided by individuals with the majority being domiciled residents of the state of Rhode Island.

“Person with a disability” means any individual who has a severe physical or mental impairment that constitutes a substantial barrier to employment, as certified by the department of human services or the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 261, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 451, § 1.

37-2.4-2.
Habilitation procurement board.

There is created the habilitation procurement board within the division of purchasing and general services of the department of administration. The board shall be composed of the following five (5) members:

The chief purchasing officer as defined in subdivision

37-2-7(3)

or his/her designee;

The director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals created under title 40.1 or his/her designee;

The director of the department of human services created under title 40 or his/her designee;

A person with a disability who shall be appointed to a three (3) year term by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate;

A representative of the private business community who shall be appointed to a three (3) year term by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate;

The board shall meet, as needed, to facilitate the procurement of goods and services from habilitation facilities by a public procurement unit under this chapter by:

Identifying goods and services that are available from habilitation facilities according to the requirements under subsections

37-2.4-3

(a), (b) and (c);

Helping to ensure that the goods and services are provided at reasonable quality and delivery levels;

Recommending to the chief purchasing officer prices in accordance with subdivision

37-2.4-3(a)(3)

for goods and services that are identified in subdivision (b)(1) of this section;

Developing, maintaining, and recommending to the chief purchasing officer a preferred procurement contract list of goods and services identified and priced under subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) of this section;

Reviewing bids received by a habilitation facility and making a recommendation of contract award to the chief purchasing officer, the awarding authority that will issue the final purchase order and renew specified contracts for set contract times, without competitive bidding, for the purchase of goods and services as provided for in §

37-2.4-3

; and

Collecting and reporting program data.

The provisions of subsection

37-2.4-2(b)

and subdivision 37-2.4-3(1) are an exception to the procurement provisions under this chapter.

If two (2) or more certified habilitation facilities bid on the solicitation of services, the purchasing agent, as defined in subdivision

37-2-7(19)

, of the state agency shall award a contract to one of the certified habilitation facility based on a competitive price determination.

The board is authorized to create advisory committees to assist it in the performance of the board’s responsibilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 261, § 1.

37-2.4-3.
Purchasing.

This section shall not apply with respect to the procurement of any commodity which is available for procurement from an entity established pursuant to chapter 7 of title 13 (“Prisoner Made Goods”) or chapter 9 of title 40 (“Services for People who are Blind or Visually Impaired”) and as provided under subsection (e) of this section and notwithstanding any provision in this chapter or the general or public laws to the contrary, any state agency shall purchase goods and services produced by a habilitation facility using the preferred procurement contract list approved pursuant to §

37-2.4-2(b)(3)

providing that:

The goods or services offered for sale by a habilitation facility reasonably conform to the needs and specifications of the public procurement unit;

The habilitation facility can supply the goods or services within a reasonable time; and

The price of the goods or services is reasonably competitive with the cost of procuring the goods or services from another source.

If there is no price agreement in place that a state agency plans to use, a price can be negotiated between the habilitation facility that can meet the specifications of the board. The board will make a recommendation to the director of administration.

Existing multi-year contracts can continue through their term. New multi-year requirements for services must follow the process for purchasing from the habilitation facility.

Each habilitation facility:

May submit a price for a product or service to the board at any time and not necessarily in response to a request for bids; and

Shall certify on any bid it submits to the board or to a public procurement unit under this section that is claiming a preference under this section.

During a fiscal year, the requirement for a public procurement unit to purchase goods and services produced by a habilitation facility under the preferred procurement list under subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section does not apply if the division of purchasing and general services determines that the total amount of procurement contracts with habilitation facilities has reached three million dollars ($3,000,000) for that fiscal year. The total amount of procurement contracts can be changed with a recommendation by the board and approval from the director of administration.

Any state agency that has awarded a solicitation for goods and services to a certified habilitation facility shall, before the expiration of the term of the contract, renegotiate a fair and reasonable price for the services with the certified habilitation facility that has performed the services for the state agency. The state agency is not permitted to solicit new bids for the product or service unless one of the following occurs:

The certified habilitation facility no longer wishes to perform the services for the state agency;

The state agency decides to perform the services internally and hires employees who will be employees of the state to perform the services;

The state agency no longer needs the service that was provided by the habilitation facility;

The habilitation facility has not met the requirements for the services offered; or

The habilitation facility and the state agency are unable to agree to fair and reasonable terms of a new contract for the habilitation facility’s services during the negotiation process.

Any state agency that has awarded a solicitation for services to a certified habilitation facility shall report to the board regarding the progress of the solicitation once a year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 261, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 7.